Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-634
Administrative appeal; notice; time allowed; hearing; parties.

(1) The claimant or any other party entitled to notice of a determination as provided in section 48-632 may file an appeal from such determination with the department.

(2) An appeal must be in writing or in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commissioner and must be delivered and received within twenty days after the date of mailing of the notice of determination to the parties' last-known address or, if such notice is not mailed, after the date of delivery of such notice of determination, except that for good cause shown an appeal filed outside the prescribed time period may be heard.

(3) In accordance with section 303 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 503, the commissioner shall provide the opportunity for a fair hearing before an impartial hearing officer on each appeal.

(4) Unless the appeal is withdrawn, a hearing officer, after affording the parties reasonable opportunities for a fair hearing, shall make findings and conclusions and on the basis thereof affirm, modify, or reverse such determination.

(5) If an appeal involves a question as to whether services were performed by the claimant in employment or for an employer, a hearing officer shall give special notice of such issue and of the pendency of the appeal to the employer and to the commissioner, both of whom shall be parties to the proceeding and be afforded a reasonable opportunity to adduce evidence bearing on such question.

(6) The parties shall be promptly notified of a hearing officer's decision and shall be furnished with a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in support of the decision.

(7) The commissioner shall be a party entitled to notice in any proceeding involving a claim for benefits before a hearing officer.

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 4, p. 386;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-706;

R.S.1943, § 48-634;

Laws 1979, LB 328, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 239, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1058, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 53.
January 1, 2018
Before appeal tribunal of Labor Department may take jurisdiction over appeal filed beyond limitation date for newly discovered evidence, appellant must demonstrate new evidence would make a valid claim or defense. Nicholson v. City of Bellevue, 215 Neb. 540, 339 N.W.2d 758 (1983).

A notice of appeal filed pursuant to this section, which is properly addressed and to which sufficient postage has been affixed, shall be valid if it is deposited in the United States mail within ten days after the mailing of the notice of the deputy's determination. Parson v. Chizek, 201 Neb. 754, 272 N.W.2d 48 (1978).

Administrative appeal within division is provided. A. Borchman Sons v. Carpenter, 166 Neb. 322, 89 N.W.2d 123 (1958).